Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2001
Street improvements; without petition or creation of district; when.

Any city or village may, without petition or creating a street improvement district, grade, curb, gutter, and pave any portion of a street otherwise paved so as to make one continuous paved street, but the portion to be so improved shall not exceed two blocks, including intersections, or thirteen hundred and twenty-five feet, whichever is the lesser. Such city or village may also grade, curb, gutter, and pave any unpaved street or alley which intersects a paved street for a distance of not to exceed one block on either side of such paved street. The improvements authorized by this section may be performed upon any portion of a street or any unpaved street or alley not previously improved to meet or exceed the minimum standards for pavement set by the city or village for its paved streets.

Laws 1963, c. 76, § 1, p. 280;

Laws 1965, c. 75, § 1, p. 307;

Laws 1974, LB 652, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 738, § 1.

The plain language of this section authorized the city to extend paving on one block of a street and assess the paving costs against abutting property owners where, at one end, the new paving adjoined a paved intersection of two paved streets. Johnson v. City of Fremont, 287 Neb. 960, 845 N.W.2d 279 (2014).

City improperly used this section to pave a three-block area with two gap paving districts. Iverson v. City of North Platte, 243 Neb. 506, 500 N.W.2d 574 (1993).

The authorization for special assessment for street improvements in sections 18-2001 to 18-2003 does not extend to a street section already paved. Turner v. City of North Platte, 203 Neb. 706, 279 N.W.2d 868 (1979).

These statutes are clear, unambiguous, and constitutional. Gaughen v. Sloup, 197 Neb. 762, 250 N.W.2d 915 (1977).

A street covered with material forming a solid aggregate 3 to 5 inches thick consisting of compacted layers of gravel and an oil-type substance and creating a firm, level surface for vehicular travel is paved within the meaning of Nebraska's "gap and extend" law. Benesch v. City of Schuyler, 5 Neb. App. 59, 555 N.W.2d 63 (1996).